West Virginia, session 2026, HB4639.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of West Virginia: ARTICLE 16. INSPECTION OF VEHICLES. §17C-16-1. Vehicles not to operate without required equipment or in unsafe condition. [Repealed]. §17C-16-2. Inspection by department of public safety. [Repealed]. §17C-16-3. Owners and drivers to comply with inspection laws. [Repealed]. §17C-16-4.  Superintendent of the West Virginia State Police to require periodic inspection; acceptance of certificate of inspection from another state; suspension of registration of unsafe vehicles. [Repealed]. §17C-16-5. Permit for official inspection stations; fees for and certificate of inspection. [Repealed]. §17C-16-6. Assignment, transfer, and posting of official inspection station permit; issuance and record of certificate of inspection; inspection fee. [Repealed]. §17C-16-7. Improper representation as official stations. [Repealed]. §17C-16-8. False certificates. [Repealed]. §17C-16-9. Operation without certificate or failure to produce certificate; penalty for misdemeanor. [Repealed].